Georgia, session 2025_26, HB697.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
(a) As used in this Act, the term:
(1) "Ad valorem taxes for educational purposes" means all ad valorem taxes for
educational purposes levied by, for, or on behalf of the City of Chickamauga independent
H. B. 697
- 1 -

LC 61 0136/AP
school district, including, but not limited to, any ad valorem taxes to pay interest on and
to retire independent school district bonded indebtedness.
(2) "Homestead" means homestead as defined and qualified in Code Section 48-5-40 of
the O.C.G.A., as amended, with the additional qualification that it shall include not more
than five contiguous acres of homestead property.
(b)(1) Each resident of the City of Chickamauga independent school district who is at least
70 years of age but less than 75 years of age on or before January 1 of the year in which
application for the exemption under this Act is made or any year subsequent to the making
of such application is granted an exemption on such person's homestead from the City of
Chickamauga independent school district ad valorem taxes for educational purposes in the
amount of $50,000.00 of the assessed value of such homestead. The value of that property
in excess of such exempted amount shall remain subject to taxation. The unremarried
surviving spouse of the person who has been granted the exemption provided for in this
paragraph shall continue to receive the exemption provided under this Act, provided that
the unremarried surviving spouse is 67 years of age or older and continues to occupy the
home as a residence and homestead.
(2) Each resident of the City of Chickamauga independent school district who is 75 years
of age or older on or before January 1 of the year in which application for the exemption
under this Act is made or any year subsequent to the making of such application is granted
an exemption on such person's homestead from the City of Chickamauga independent
school district ad valorem taxes for educational purposes in the amount of the full assessed
value of that homestead. The unremarried surviving spouse of the person who has been
granted the exemption provided for in this paragraph shall continue to receive the
exemption provided under this Act, provided that the unremarried surviving spouse is 70
years of age or older and continues to occupy the home as a residence and homestead.
H. B. 697
- 2 -

LC 61 0136/AP
(c) A person shall not receive the homestead exemption granted by subsection (b) of this
section unless such person or person's agent files an application with the governing authority
of the City of Chickamauga, or the designee thereof, giving such person's age and such
additional information relative to receiving such exemption as will enable the governing
authority of the City of Chickamauga, or the designee thereof, to make a determination
regarding the initial and continuing eligibility of such person for such exemption. The
governing authority of the City of Chickamauga, or the designee thereof, shall provide
application forms for this purpose.
(d) The exemption shall be claimed and returned as provided in Code Section 48-5-50.1 of
the O.C.G.A., as amended. The exemption shall be automatically renewed from year to year
so long as the person granted the homestead exemption under subsection (b) of this section
occupies the residence as a homestead. After such person has filed the proper application as
provided in subsection (c) of this section, it shall not be necessary to make application
thereafter for any year, and such exemption shall continue to be allowed to such person. It
shall be the duty of any such person granted the homestead exemption under subsection (b)
of this section to notify the governing authority of the City of Chickamauga, or the designee
thereof, in the event that such person for any reason becomes ineligible for such exemption.
(e) The exemption granted by subsection (b) of this section shall not apply to or affect any
state ad valorem taxes, county ad valorem taxes for county purposes, municipal ad valorem
taxes for municipal purposes, or county school district ad valorem taxes for educational
purposes. The homestead exemptions granted by subsection (b) of this section shall be in
lieu of and not in addition to any other homestead exemption applicable to the City of
Chickamauga independent school district ad valorem taxes for educational purposes.
(f) The exemptions granted by subsection (b) of this section shall apply to all taxable years
beginning on or after January 1, 2026.
H. B. 697
- 3 -

LC 61 0136/AP
SECTION 2.
In accordance with the requirements of Article VII, Section II of the Constitution of the State
of Georgia, this Act shall not become law unless it receives the requisite two-thirds' majority
vote in both the Senate and the House of Representatives.
SECTION 3.
The municipal election superintendent of the City of Chickamauga shall call and conduct an
election as provided in this section for the purpose of submitting this Act to the electors of
the City of Chickamauga independent school district for approval or rejection. The
municipal election superintendent shall conduct that election on the Tuesday after the first
Monday in November, 2025, and shall issue the call and conduct that election as provided
by general law. The municipal election superintendent shall cause the date and purpose of
the election to be published once a week for two weeks immediately preceding the date
thereof in the official organ of Walker County. The ballot shall have written or printed
thereon the words:
"( ) YES Shall the Act be approved which provides a homestead exemption from City
of Chickamauga independent school district ad valorem taxes for educational
( ) NO purposes in the amount of $50,000.00 of the assessed value of the homestead
for residents of such school district who are 70 years of age or older and
which provides a homestead exemption from City of Chickamauga
independent school district ad valorem taxes for educational purposes in the
amount of the full assessed value of the homestead for residents of such
school district who are 75 years of age or older?"
All persons desiring to vote for approval of the Act shall vote "Yes," and all persons desiring
to vote for rejection of the Act shall vote "No." If more than one-half of the votes cast on
such question are for approval of the Act, Section 1 of this Act shall become of full force and
effect on January 1, 2026. If the Act is not so approved or if the election is not conducted
H. B. 697
- 4 -

LC 61 0136/AP
as provided in this section, Section 1 of this Act shall not become effective, and this Act shall
be automatically repealed on the 365th calendar day following the election date provided for
in this section. The expense of such election shall be borne by the City of Chickamauga. It
shall be the municipal election superintendent's duty to certify the result thereof to the
Secretary of State. The provisions of this section shall be mandatory upon the municipal
election superintendent and are not intended as directory. If the municipal election
superintendent fails or refuses to comply with this section, any elector of the City of
100 Chickamauga independent school district may apply for a writ of mandamus to compel the
101 municipal election superintendent to perform his or her duties under this section. If the court
102 finds that the municipal election superintendent has not complied with this section, the court
103 shall fashion appropriate relief requiring the municipal election superintendent to call and
104 conduct such election on the date required by this section or on the next date authorized for
105 special elections provided for in Code Section 21-2-540 of the O.C.G.A.
106 SECTION 4.
107 Except as otherwise provided in Section 3 of this Act, this Act shall become effective upon
108 its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval.
109 SECTION 5.
110 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 697
- 5 -